Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 2. Local Registrars.

Collateral references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d, Health, § 108.

39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, §§ 74, 75.

Sec. 18.50.080.
Appointment of local registrars.

Where feasible, the state registrar shall use the services of a local recording official located within a registration district as local registrar of vital statistics.

Where utilization under (a) of this section is not feasible, the state registrar shall appoint a local registrar and may appoint one or more deputy local registrars of vital statistics for each registration district, to be compensated on a fee basis as specified in AS

18.50.120

.

The state registrar may remove a local registrar or a deputy local registrar appointed under (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 7 ch 118 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 7 AAC 5, art. 1.

Sec. 18.50.090.
Duties of local registrars.

Within the local registration district, the local registrar shall

administer and enforce this chapter, and the instructions issued and regulations adopted under it;

require that certificates be completed and filed in accordance with this chapter, and the instructions issued and regulations adopted under it;

transmit monthly, or more frequently when directed to do so by the state registrar, the certificates, reports, or other returns filed with the local registrar, to the local recording official or to the bureau in accordance with the regulations adopted and instructions issued under this chapter;

maintain the records, make reports, and perform the other duties required by the state registrar.

History.

(§ 8 a ch 118 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 7 AAC 5, art. 1.

For births, deaths, burial permits, marriages, divorces, adoptions, see 7 AAC 5, art. 2.

For special procedures, see 7 AAC 5, art. 3.

Sec. 18.50.100.
Keeping of permanent records.

The state registrar may, where feasible, require permanent local records to be kept in the form of copies of the original vital statistics records. The state registrar shall designate in each case how this is to be done by the local recording official, in connection with other local registrars of vital statistics in the recording area.
The state registrar shall issue instructions concerning the keeping of these records, their disclosure, corrections, issuance of copies, and fees to be charged.
In matters pertaining to the system of vital statistics, the local recording officials and local registrars shall be directly supervised in this work by the state registrar.

History.

(§ 8 b ch 118 SLA 1960)

Cross references. —

For inspection and copying of public records, see AS

40.25.120

—

40.25.220

.

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 7 AAC 5, art. 1.

Sec. 18.50.110.
Duties of deputy local registrar.

In accordance with regulations adopted under this chapter, the deputy local registrar shall perform the duties of the local registrar in the absence or incapacity of the local registrar and shall perform other duties required by the state registrar.

History.

(§ 8 c ch 118 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 7 AAC 5, art. 1.

Sec. 18.50.120.
Compensation of local registrars.

When a local recording official receiving a salary or other regular compensation for general recording duties serves as local registrar of vital statistics, the local registrar is not entitled to fees under this section. Otherwise, local registrars of vital statistics shall be paid, from funds appropriated for this purpose, as follows:

for a certificate of birth, death, fetal death, or marriage occurring in the registration district, properly completed and transmitted by the local registrar in accordance with the regulations adopted and instructions issued under this chapter, $2;

for each monthly report indicating the number of the various vital events that occurred in the registration district, properly made in accordance with the regulations adopted and instructions issued under this chapter, $1.

History.

(§ 9 ch 118 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 7 AAC 5, art. 1.

Sec. 18.50.130.
Subregistrars.

In registration districts containing scattered villages, the local registrar may, with the approval of the state registrar, designate one person in each village as subregistrar for a designated area.

The subregistrar is responsible for preparing, signing, and filing with the local registrar, in accordance with instructions of the bureau, a certificate for each birth, death, and fetal death occurring in the area designated and not attended by a physician or nurse.

For each certificate filed in accordance with instructions of the bureau the subregistrar is entitled to a fee of $1.

History.

(§ 10 ch 118 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 7 AAC 5, art. 1.

Sec. 18.50.140.
Payment of fees to local registrars and others.

The state registrar shall certify monthly, or at least quarterly, the number and type of records filed by, and the amount due to each local registrar and deputy registrar, and the amount due to each subregistrar. Upon certification, the amounts due shall be paid from the proper state appropriations by the Department of Administration.

History.

(§ 11 ch 118 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 7 AAC 5, art. 1.

For births, deaths, burial permits, marriages, divorces, adoptions, see 7 AAC 5, art. 2.